ru: Тип масляного фильтра: Картридж; Центрифуга (роторная); Магистральный; Выносной; Разборный со сменным элементом; Накручиваемый; Другое
nl: Oliefilter stijl: Patroon; Centrifugaal (rotor); Inline; Montage op afstand; Vervangbaar element (bus); Spin-on (opschroefbaar); Overig
pl: Styl filtra oleju: Wkład; Odśrodkowy (wirnik); Przelotowy; Montowany zewnętrznie; Wymienny element (puszka); Nakręcany; Inny
zh-TW: 機油濾清器款式: 濾芯式; 離心式 (轉子); 內聯式; 遠端安裝; 可替換濾芯 (濾罐); 旋裝式; 其他
en: Oil filter style: Cartridge; Centrifugal (rotor); Inline; Remote mount; Replaceable element (canister); Spin-on; Other
bg-BG: Стил на масления филтър: Патрон; Центробежен (ротор); Редови; Изнесен монтаж; Сменяем елемент (контейнер); Навиващ се; Друго
hr-HR: Stil filtra za ulje: Uložak; Centrifugalni (rotor); Linijski (inline); Daljinska montaža; Zamjenjivi element (kanistar); Uvrtni (spin-on); Ostalo
pt-BR: Filtro de óleo estilo: Cartucho; Centrífugo (rotor); Em linha; Montagem remota; Elemento substituível (recipiente); Rosqueável; Outro
tr: Yağ filtresi tipi: Kartuş; Santrifüjlü (rotor); Hat içi; Uzaktan montaj; Değiştirilebilir elemanlı (kutu tipi); Vidalı (spin-on); Diğer
pt-PT: estilo de filtro de óleo: Cartucho; Centrífugo (rotor); Em linha; Montagem remota; Elemento substituível (recipiente); De roscar; Outro
sk-SK: Štýl olejového filtra: Kazetový; Odstredivý (rotor); Inline; Vzdialená montáž; Vymeniteľný prvok (nádobka); Naskrutkovací; Iný
zh-CN: 机油滤清器样式: 滤芯式; 离心式（转子）; 直列式; 远程安装; 可替换滤芯（滤清器罐）; 旋装式; 其他
es: Tipo de filtro de aceite: Cartucho; Centrífugo (rotor); En línea; Montaje remoto; Elemento reemplazable (recipiente); Roscado; Otro
hu: Olajszűrő stílusa: Patron; Centrifugális (rotor); Soros; Különálló rögzítésű; Cserélhető betét (tartály); Felcsavarozható; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu lọc dầu: Lõi lọc; Ly tâm (rotor); Lắp trên đường ống; Lắp ngoài; Phần tử lọc thay thế (cốc lọc); Vặn ren; Khác
ro-RO: Stilul filtrului de ulei: Cartuș; Centrifugal (rotor); În linie; Montare la distanță; Element înlocuibil (canistră); Înfiletabil; Altele
it: Tipo di filtro dell'olio: A cartuccia; Centrifugo (rotore); In linea; A montaggio remoto; Elemento sostituibile (contenitore); A vite (spin-on); Altro
nb: Oljefiltertype: Innsats; Sentrifugal (rotor); In-line; Fjernmontering; Utskiftbart element (beholder); Spin-on; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta oljnega filtra: Vložek; Centrifugalni (rotor); Linijski; Zunanja montaža; Zamenljiv element (ohišje); Na privijanje (spin-on); Drugo
fi: Öljynsuodattimen tyyppi: Patruuna; Keskipako (roottori); Linjasuodatin; Erillisasennettava; Vaihdettava elementti (kotelo); Kierrettävä (Spin-on); Muu
ja: オイルフィルタータイプ: カートリッジ; 遠心分離式 (ローター); インライン; リモートマウント; 交換可能エレメント (キャニスター); スピンオン; その他
th: แบบกรองน้ำมันเครื่อง: คาร์ทริดจ์; แบบเหวี่ยงศูนย์กลาง (โรเตอร์); อินไลน์; ติดตั้งระยะไกล; ชิ้นส่วนที่เปลี่ยนได้ (กระป๋อง); สปินออน; อื่นๆ
sv: Oljefilterstil: Insatsfilter; Centrifugal (rotor); In-line; Extern montering; Utbytbart element (behållare); Spin-on; Övrigt
cs: Styl olejového filtru: Vložka; Odstředivý (rotor); Průtokový; Oddělený; Vyměnitelná vložka (v nádobce); Šroubovací (spin-on); Ostatní
de: Typ des Ölfilters: Filtereinsatz; Zentrifugal (Rotor); Inline; Remote-Montage; Wechselelement (Kanister); Anschraubfilter (Spin-On); Andere
da: Oliefiltertype: Indsats; Centrifugal (rotor); Inline; Fjernmonteret; Udskifteligt element (dåse); Spin-on; Andet
el: Στυλ φίλτρου λαδιού: Φυσίγγιο; Φυγόκεντρο (ρότορας); Εν σειρά; Απομακρυσμένης τοποθέτησης; Ανταλλακτικό στοιχείο (δοχείο); Βιδωτό (Spin-on); Άλλο
fr: Type de filtre à huile: Cartouche; Centrifuge (rotor); En ligne; Montage déporté; Élément remplaçable (cartouche); À visser; Autre
ko: 오일 필터 방식: 카트리지; 원심형(로터); 인라인; 원격 마운트; 교체형 엘리먼트(캐니스터); 스핀온; 기타
lt-LT: Alyvos filtro tipas: Kasetė; Išcentrinis (rotorius); Linijinis; Nuotolinis tvirtinimas; Keičiamas elementas (talpykla); Užsukamas; Kita